Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.910

Authority—Liberal construction of chapter—Modification of inconsistent acts.

This chapter shall be complete authority for the establishment, construction and operation and maintenance of a system or systems of sewerage and/or water hereby authorized, and shall be liberally construed to accomplish its purpose. Any act inconsistent herewith shall be deemed modified to conform with the provisions of this chapter for the purpose of this chapter only.

[ 1967 c 72 s 31.]